Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 1 General Provisions

Cross references.

Nonprofit corporations generally, T. 14, C. 3.

County and municipal regulation of roadhouses, public dance halls, and other facilities, §

43-21-50

.

3-7-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Bona fide private club” means any nonprofit association organized under the laws of this state which:

Has been in existence at least one year prior to the filing of its application for a license to be issued pursuant to this chapter;

Has at least 75 regular dues-paying members;

Owns, hires, or leases a building or space within a building for the reasonable use of its members, which building or space:

Has suitable kitchen and dining room space and equipment; and

Is staffed with a sufficient number of employees for cooking, preparing, and serving meals for its members and guests; and

Has no member, officer, agent, or employee directly or indirectly receiving, in the form of salary or other compensation, any profits from the sale of alcoholic beverages beyond a fixed salary.

“Fixed salary” means the amount of compensation paid any member, officer, agent, or employee of a bona fide private club as may be fixed for him by its members at a prior annual meeting or by the governing body out of the general revenue of the club and shall not include any commission on any profits from the sale of alcoholic beverages. For the purposes of this definition, tips or gratuities which are added to the bills under club regulations shall not be considered profits from the sale of alcoholic beverages.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1155, § 2; Code 1933, § 5A-6101, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-7-2.
Applicability of chapter to private clubs.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a bona fide private club at which the sale of distilled spirits or other alcoholic beverages by the drink for consumption only on the premises where sold is otherwise authorized pursuant to this chapter is authorized to sell those same distilled spirits and other alcoholic beverages by the drink at any time on Sundays.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-7-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 830, § 1A; Ga. L. 1999, p. 1225, § 2.

Cross references.

Service of alcohol at technical institute, §

3-8-6

.